Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1726.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3235 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. An institution of higher education within The Oklahoma State
System of Higher Education utilizing graduate students as
instructors of record or as primary classroom instructors in
undergraduate courses shall establish and maintain a formal training
program to ensure such graduate instructors are adequately prepared
for their instructional responsibilities.
B. The training required by subsection A of this section shall
include effective teaching practices, classroom management,
assessment and grading standards, student accommodations, academic
integrity, and applicable institutional, state, and federal
policies. The training shall also include instruction on the
protection of students’ rights under the First Amendment to the
United States Constitution including the principles of free speech,

free inquiry, and viewpoint neutrality. The training shall
emphasize that students shall not be penalized or disadvantaged in
grading, participation, or evaluation on the basis of lawful
expression.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1726 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 14th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1726 Page 3